Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.030

Petition for incorporation—Contents.

The petition for incorporation shall: (1) Indicate whether the proposed city or town shall be a noncharter code city operating under Title 35A RCW, or a city or town operating under Title 35 RCW; (2) indicate the form or plan of government the city or town is to have; (3) set forth and particularly describe the proposed boundaries of the proposed city or town; (4) state the name of the proposed city or town; (5) state the number of inhabitants therein, as nearly as may be; and (6) pray that the city or town be incorporated. The petition shall conform to the requirements for form prescribed in RCW 35A.01.040. The petition shall include the identification number provided under RCW 35.02.017 and state the last date by which the petition may be filed, as determined under RCW 35.02.020.

If the proposed city or town is located in more than one county, the petition shall be prepared in such a manner as to indicate the different counties within which the signators reside.

A city or town operating under Title 35 RCW may have a mayor/council, council/manager, or commission form of government. A city operating under Title 35A RCW may have a mayor/council or council/manager plan of government.

If the petition fails to specify the matters described in subsection (1) of this section, the proposal shall be to incorporate as a noncharter code city. If the petition fails to specify the matter described in subsection (2) of this section, the proposal shall be to incorporate with a mayor/council form or plan of government.

[ 1994 c 216 s 3; 1986 c 234 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.02.030. Prior: 1957 c 173 s 3; prior: 1953 c 219 s 2; 1890 p 131 s 2, part; 1888 p 221 ss 1, 2, part; 1877 p 173 ss 1, 2, part; 1871 p 51 s 1, part; RRS s 8884, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.